test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-redzeet_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - redzēt: # Verb 'eng divide/fin jakaa' - full paradigm /http://ezis.ailab.lv:8182/inflect/json/en/redzēt/
     redzēt+V+TV+Inf: redzēt
     redzēt+V+TV+Ind+Fut+Sg1: redzēšu
     redzēt+V+TV+Ind+Fut+Sg2: redzēsi
     redzēt+V+TV+Ind+Fut+Pl1: redzēsim
     redzēt+V+TV+Ind+Fut+Pl2: redzēsiet
     redzēt+V+TV+Ind+Fut+SP3: redzēs

     redzēt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: redzu
     redzēt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: redzi
     redzēt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: redzam
     redzēt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: redzat
     redzēt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+SP3: redz

     redzēt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg1: redzēju
     redzēt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg2: redzēji
     redzēt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl1: redzējām
     redzēt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl2: redzējāt
     redzēt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+SP3: redzēja

     redzēt+V+TV+Deb+Prs: jāredz
     redzēt+V+TV+Quo+Prs: redzot
     redzēt+V+TV+Quo+Fut: redzēšot
     redzēt+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: redzi
     redzēt+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: redziet

     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: redzošs
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: redzoša
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: redzošam
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: redzošu
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: redzošā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: redzoši
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: redzošu
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: redzošiem
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: redzošus
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: redzošos
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: redzošais
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: redzošā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: redzošajam
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: redzošo
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: redzošajā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [redzošais, redzošo]
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: redzošie
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: redzošo
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: redzošajiem
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: redzošos
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: redzošajos
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: redzošie
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: redzoša
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: redzošas
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: redzošai
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: redzošu
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: redzošā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: redzošas
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: redzošu
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: redzošām
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: redzošas
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: redzošās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: redzošā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: redzošās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: redzošajai
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: redzošo
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: redzošajā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: redzošā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: redzošās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: redzošo
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: redzošajām
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: redzošās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: redzošajās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: redzošās

     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: redzējis
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: redzējuša
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: redzējušam
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: redzējušu
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: redzējušā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: redzējuši
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: redzējušu
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: redzējušiem
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: redzējušus
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: redzējušos
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: redzējušais
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: redzējušā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: redzējušajam
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: redzējušo
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: redzējušajā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: redzējušais
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: redzējušie
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: redzējušo
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: redzējušajiem
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: redzējušos
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: redzējušajos
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: redzējušie
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: redzējusi
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: redzējušas
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: redzējušai
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: redzējušu
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: redzējušā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: redzējušas
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: redzējušu
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: redzējušām
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: redzējušas
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: redzējušās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: redzējusī
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: redzējušās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: redzējušajai
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: redzējušo
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: redzējušajā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: redzējusī
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: redzējušās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: redzējušo
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: redzējušajām
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: redzējušās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: redzējušajās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: redzējušās

     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: redzams
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: redzama
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: redzamam
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: redzamu
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: redzamā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: redzami
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: redzamu
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: redzamiem
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: redzamus
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: redzamos
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: redzamais
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: redzamā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: redzamajam
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: redzamo
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: redzamajā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [redzamais, redzamo]
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: redzamie
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: redzamo
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: redzamajiem
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: redzamos
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: redzamajos
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: redzamie
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: redzama
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: redzamas
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: redzamai
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: redzamu
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: redzamā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: redzamas
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: redzamu
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: redzamām
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: redzamas
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: redzamās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: redzamā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: redzamās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: redzamajai
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: redzamo
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: redzamajā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: redzamā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: redzamās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: redzamo
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: redzamajām
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: redzamās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: redzamajās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: redzamās

     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: redzēts
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: redzēta
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: redzētam
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: redzētu
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: redzētā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: redzēti
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: redzētu
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: redzētiem
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: redzētus
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: redzētos
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: redzētais
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: redzētā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: redzētajam
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: redzēto
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: redzētajā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [redzētais, redzēto]
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: redzētie
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: redzēto
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: redzētajiem
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: redzētos
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: redzētajos
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: redzētie
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: redzēta
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: redzētas
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: redzētai
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: redzētu
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: redzētā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: redzētas
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: redzētu
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: redzētām
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: redzētas
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: redzētās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: redzētā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: redzētās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: redzētajai
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: redzēto
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: redzētajā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: redzētā
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: redzētās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: redzēto
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: redzētajām
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: redzētās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: redzētajās
     redzēt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: redzētās
#"Declension":"4"
     redzēt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: redzēšana
     redzēt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: redzēšanas
     redzēt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: redzēšanai
     redzēt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: redzēšanu
     redzēt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: redzēšanā
     redzēt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Voc: redzēšana
     redzēt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: redzēšanas
     redzēt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: redzēšanu
     redzēt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: redzēšanām
     redzēt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Acc: redzēšanas
     redzēt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: redzēšanās
     redzēt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Voc: redzēšanas
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: redzēdams
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: redzēdama
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: redzēdami
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: redzēdamas

#     redzēt+V+TV+Der/Adv+Adv+Pos: rokoši
